Washington statutes.
RCW 36.61.240

Special assessments—Lien—Validity—Foreclosure.

Special assessments shall be valid and enforceable as such and the lien thereof on the property assessed shall be valid if the county legislative authority in making the special assessments acted in good faith and without fraud. Delinquent special assessments or installments shall be foreclosed in the same manner as special assessments are foreclosed under chapter 36.94 RCW. Public property subject to special assessments shall not be subject to liens.

[ 1985 c 398 s 24.]